Utah statutes.
63A-13-302.   Access to employees -- Cooperating with investigation or audit.

(1)  The office shall have access to interview the following persons if the inspector general determines that the interview may assist the inspector general in fulfilling the duties described in Section 63A-13-202:

(a)  a state executive branch official, executive director, director, or employee;

(b)  a local government official or employee;

(c)  a consultant or contractor of a person described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b); or

(d)  a provider or a health care professional or an employee of a provider or a health care professional.

(2)  A person described in Subsection (1) and each supervisor of the person shall fully cooperate with the office by:

(a)  providing the office or the inspector general's designee with access to interview the person;

(b)  completely and truthfully answering questions asked by the office or the inspector general's designee;

(c)  providing the records, described in Subsection 63A-13-301(1), in the manner described in Subsection 63A-13-301(4), requested by the office or the inspector general's designee; and

(d)  providing the office or the inspector general's designee with information relating to the office's investigation or audit.

(3)  A person described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b) and each supervisor of the person shall fully cooperate with the office by:

(a)  providing records requested by the office or the inspector general's designee in the manner described in Subsection 63A-13-301(4); and

(b)  providing the office or the inspector general's designee with information relating to the office's investigation or audit, including information that is classified as private, controlled, or protected under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 12, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 359, 2013 General Session

